Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 1. General Provisions.

§79-14-101.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Mississippi Uniform Limited Partnership Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-101 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 101;
Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 12;
Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 40;
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 41, effective from and after January 1, 2015; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] provided definitions of terms used in the chapter. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-102.

For the text of the Mississippi Uniform Partnership Law see §§ 79-13-101 et seq.

Further definition of “certificate of limited partnership”, see § 79-14-1106.

Alabama Code, §§ 10A-9-1.02 through 10A-9-12.08.

Arkansas Code Annotated, §§ 4-47-101 through 4-47-1302.

Florida Annotated Statutes, §§ 620.1101 through 620.2205.

Georgia Code Annotated, §§ 14-9-100 through 14-9-1204.

North Carolina General Statutes, §§ 59-101 through 59-1107.

South Carolina Code Annotated, §§ 33-42-10 through 33-42-2140.

Tennessee Code Annotated, §§ 61-2-101 through 61-2-1208.

Texas Annotated Statutes, §§ 153.001 through 153.555.

Alabama: Code of Ala. § 10-9B-101 et seq.

Alaska: Alaska Stat. § 32.11.010 et seq.

Arizona: A.R.S. § 29-301 et seq.

Arkansas: A.C.A. § 4-47-101 et seq.

California: Cal Corp. Code § 15900 et seq.

Colorado: C.R.S. 7-62-101 et seq.

Connecticut: Conn. Gen. Stat. § 34-9 et seq.

Delaware: 6 Del. C. § 17-101 et seq.

District of Columbia: D.C. Code § 33-201.01 et seq.

Florida: Fla. Stat. § 620.1101 et seq.

Georgia: O.C.G.A. § 14-9-100 et seq.

Hawaii: HRS § 425E-101 et seq.

Idaho: Idaho Code § 53-2-101 et seq.

Illinois: 805 ILCS 210/100 et seq.

Indiana: Burns Ind. Code Ann. § 23-16-1-1.

Iowa: Iowa Code § 488.101 et seq.

Kansas: K.S.A. § 56-1a01 et seq.

Kentucky: KRS § 362.2-102 et seq.

Maine: 31 M.R.S. § 1301 et seq.

Maryland: Md. Corporations and Associations Code Ann. § 10-101 et seq.

Massachusetts: ALM GL ch. 109, § 1 et seq.

Michigan: MCLS § 449.1101 et seq.

Minnesota: Minn. Stat. §§ 321.0101 et seq. and 322A.01 et seq.

Missouri: § 359.011 R.S.Mo. et seq.

Montana: Mont. Code Anno., § 35-12-501 et seq.

Nebraska: R.R.S. Neb. § 67-233 et seq.

Nevada: NRS § 87A.005 et seq.

New Hampshire: RSA 304-B:1 et seq.

New Jersey: N.J. Stat. § 42:2A-1 et seq.

New Mexico: N.M. Stat. Ann. § 54-2A-101 et seq.

New York: NY CLS Partn. § 90.

North Carolina: N.C. Gen. Stat. § 59-101 et seq.

North Dakota: N.D. Cent. Code, § 45-10.2-01 et seq.

Ohio: ORC Ann. § 1782.01 et seq.

Oklahoma: 54 Okl. St. § 1-906 et seq.

Oregon: ORS § 70.005 et seq.

Pennsylvania: 15 Pa. C. S. § 8501 et seq.

Rhode Island: R.I. Gen. Laws § 7-13-1 et seq.

South Carolina: S.C. Code Ann. § 33-42-10 et seq.

South Dakota: S.D. Codified Laws § 48-7-101 et seq.

Tennessee: Tenn. Code Ann. § 61-2-101 et seq.

Texas: Tex. Rev. Civ. Stat. art. 6132a-1.

Utah: Utah Code Ann. § 48-2a-101 et seq.

Vermont: 11 V.S.A. § 3401 et seq.

Virgin Islands: 26 V.I.C. § 321 et seq.

Virginia: Va. Code Ann. § 50-73.1 et seq.

Washington: Rev. Code Wash. § 25.10.010 et seq.

West Virginia: W. Va. Code § 47-9-1 et seq.

Wisconsin: Wis. Stat. § 179.01 et seq.

Wyoming: Wyo. Stat. § 17-14-201 et seq.

Nonresident limited partners of a nonresident limited partnership doing business in the state could not be made subject to jurisdiction of the state’s courts in an action against the partnership where they had done none of the acts specified by the long arm statute (§ 13-3-57) as prerequisites to jurisdiction, and had paid their indebtedness to the partnership in full, thus, under the statute governing circumstances in which limited partners are proper parties to a suit against the partnership (§§ 79-13-3, 79-13-51[repealed]), not being subject to being made parties. Ga-Pak Lumber Co. v. Nalley, 337 So. 2d 1270, 1976 Miss. LEXIS 1615 (Miss. 1976).

§79-14-102.
Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Certificate of limited partnership” means the certificate required by Section 79-14-201. The term includes the certificate as amended or restated.

“Contribution”, except in the phrase “right of contribution,” means property or a benefit described in Section 79-14-501 which is provided by a person to a limited partnership to become a partner or in the person’s capacity as a partner.

“Debtor in bankruptcy” means a person that is the subject of:

“Distribution” means a transfer of money or other property from a limited partnership to a person on account of a transferable interest or in the person’s capacity as a partner. The term:

“Foreign limited liability limited partnership” means a foreign limited partnership whose general partners have limited liability for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the foreign partnership under a provision similar to Section 79-14-404(c).

“Foreign limited partnership” means an unincorporated entity formed under the law of a jurisdiction other than this state which would be a limited partnership if formed under the law of this state. The term includes a foreign limited liability limited partnership.

“General partner” means a person that:

“Jurisdiction,” used to refer to a political entity, means the United States, a state, a foreign country, or a political subdivision of a foreign country.

“Jurisdiction of formation” means the jurisdiction whose law governs the internal affairs of an entity.

“Limited liability limited partnership,” except in the phrase “foreign limited liability limited partnership” and in Article 11, means a limited partnership whose certificate of limited partnership states that the partnership is a limited liability limited partnership.

“Limited partner” means a person that:

“Limited partnership,” except in the phrase “foreign limited partnership” and in Article 11, means an entity formed under this chapter or which becomes subject to this chapter under Article 11 or Section 79-14-112. The term includes a limited liability limited partnership.

“Partner” means a limited partner or general partner.

“Partnership agreement” means the agreement, whether or not referred to as a partnership agreement and whether oral, implied, in a record, or in any combination thereof, of all the partners of a limited partnership concerning the matters described in Section 79-14-105(a). The term includes the agreement as amended or restated.

“Person” means an individual, business corporation, nonprofit corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, agricultural association, unincorporated nonprofit association, statutory trust, business trust, common-law business trust, estate, trust, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Principal office” means the principal executive office of a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership, whether or not the office is located in this state.

“Property” means all property, whether real, personal, or mixed or tangible or intangible, or any right or interest therein.

“Record,” used as a noun, means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Registered agent” means an agent of a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership which is authorized to receive service of any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the partnership.

“Registered foreign limited partnership” means a foreign limited partnership that is registered to do business in this state pursuant to a statement of registration filed by the Secretary of State.

“Required information” means the information that a limited partnership is required to maintain under Section 79-14-108.

“Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Transfer” includes:

“Transferable interest” means the right, as initially owned by a person in the person’s capacity as a partner, to receive distributions from a limited partnership, whether or not the person remains a partner or continues to own any part of the right. The term applies to any fraction of the interest, by whomever owned.

“Transferee” means a person to which all or part of a transferable interest has been transferred, whether or not the transferor is a partner. The term includes a person that owns a transferable interest under Section 79-14-602(a)(3) or 79-14-605(a)(4).

An order for relief under Title 11 of the United States Code or a comparable order under a successor statute of general application; or

A comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency.

Includes:

A redemption or other purchase by a limited partnership of a transferable interest; and

A transfer to a partner in return for the partner’s relinquishment of any right to participate as a partner in the management or conduct of the partnership’s activities and affairs or to have access to records or other information concerning the partnership’s activities and affairs; and

Does not include amounts constituting reasonable compensation for present or past service or payments made in the ordinary course of business under a bona fide retirement plan or other bona fide benefits program.

Has become a general partner under Section 79-14-401 or was a general partner in a partnership when the partnership became subject to this chapter under Section 79-14-112; and

Has not dissociated as a general partner under Section 79-14-603.

Has become a limited partner under Section 79-14-301 or was a limited partner in a limited partnership when the partnership became subject to this chapter under Section 79-14-112; and

Has not dissociated under Section 79-14-601.

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

An assignment;

A conveyance;

A sale;

A lease;

An encumbrance, including a mortgage or security interest;

A gift; and

A transfer by operation of law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-102 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 102;
Laws, 1990, ch. 385, § 1, effective from and after passage (approved March 13, 1990); Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] provided certain requirements regarding the name of a limited partnership. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-114.

Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-1.01 et seq.

Provision that limited partner who permits his name to be used in name of limited partnership may in some circumstances be liable to creditors of limited partnership, see § 79-14-303.

Names under which foreign limited partnerships may register prior to transacting business in this state, see § 79-14-904.

Applicability of this section to limited partnerships formed prior to the effective date of the Mississippi Limited Partnership Act, see § 79-14-1106.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership § 789.

68 C.J.S., Partnership § 562.

§79-14-103.
Knowledge; notice.

A person knows a fact if the person:

Has actual knowledge of it; or

Is deemed to know it under law other than this chapter.

A person has notice of a fact if the person:

Has reason to know the fact from all the facts known to the person at the time in question; or

Is deemed to have notice of the fact under subsection (c) or (d).

A certificate of limited partnership on file in the office of the Secretary of State is notice that the partnership is a limited partnership and the persons designated in the certificate as general partners are general partners. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), the certificate is not notice of any other fact.

A person not a partner is deemed to have notice of:

Another person’s dissociation as a general partner, ninety (90) days after an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership which states that the other person has dissociated becomes effective, or ninety (90) days after a statement of dissociation pertaining to the other person becomes effective, whichever occurs first;

A limited partnership’s:

Dissolution, ninety (90) days after the statement of dissolution becomes effective;

Participation in a conversion or domestication under the Mississippi Entity Conversion and Domestication Act, ninety (90) days after the effective date of statement of conversion or domestication.

Participation in a merger under Article 11, ninety (90) days after the effective date of the articles of merger.

Subject to Section 79-14-210(f), a person notifies another person of a fact by taking steps reasonably required to inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not those steps cause the other person to know the fact.

A general partner’s knowledge or notice of a fact relating to the limited partnership is effective immediately as knowledge of or notice to the partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of the general partner. A limited partner’s knowledge or notice of a fact relating to the partnership is not effective as knowledge of or notice to the partnership.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-103 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 103;
Laws, 2014, ch. 468, § 3, effective from and after July 1, 2014; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the reservation of a legal name that complied with former
§ 79-14-102. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-115.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Filing fees, see § 79-14-1104.

Mississippi Entity Conversion and Domestication Act, see § 79-37-101 et seq.

§79-14-104.
Governing law.

The law of this state governs:

The internal affairs of a limited partnership; and

The liability of a partner as partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited partnership.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-104 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 104;
Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 86, effective from and after January 1, 2013; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] required a limited partnership to have and maintain an office in the State of Mississippi.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Requirement that certificate of limited partnership set forth address of office and of registered agent, see § 79-14-201.

Applicability of this section to limited partnerships formed prior to the effective date of the Mississippi Limited Partnership Act (January 1, 1988), see § 79-14-1106.

§79-14-105.
Partnership agreement; scope, function, and limitations.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d), the partnership agreement governs:

Relations among the partners as partners and between the partners and the limited partnership;

The activities and affairs of the partnership and the conduct of those activities and affairs; and

The means and conditions for amending the partnership agreement.

Vary the provisions of Section 79-14-204;

Vary the right of a general partner under Section 79-14-406(b)(2) to vote on or consent to an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership which deletes a statement that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership;

Alter or eliminate the duty of loyalty or the duty of care except as otherwise provided in subsection (d);

Eliminate the contractual obligation of good faith and fair dealing under Sections 79-14-305(a) and 79-14-409(d), but the partnership agreement may prescribe the standards, if not manifestly unreasonable, by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured;

Relieve or exonerate a person from liability for conduct involving bad faith, willful or intentional misconduct, or knowing violation of law;

Vary the information required under Section 79-14-108 or unreasonably restrict the duties and rights under Section 79-14-304 or 79-14-407, but the partnership agreement may impose reasonable restrictions on the availability and use of information obtained under those sections and may define appropriate remedies, including liquidated damages, for a breach of any reasonable restriction on use;

Vary the grounds for expulsion stated in Section 79-14-603(5)(B);

Vary the power of a person to dissociate as a general partner under Section 79-14-604(a), except to require that the notice under Section 79-14-603(1) be in a record;

Vary the causes of dissolution specified in Section 79-14-801(a)(6);

Vary the requirement to wind up the partnership’s activities and affairs as specified in Section 79-14-802(a), (b)(1), and (d);

Unreasonably restrict the right of a partner to maintain an action under Article 9;

Vary the provisions of Section 79-14-905, but the partnership agreement may provide that the partnership may not have a special litigation committee;

Vary the right of a partner to approve a conversion or domestication under the Mississippi Entity Conversion and Domestication Act;

Vary the required contents of a plan of merger under Article 11 or plan of conversion or plan of domestication under the Mississippi Entity Conversion and Domestication Act; or

Except as otherwise provided in Sections 79-14-106 and 79-14-107(b), restrict the rights under this chapter of a person other than a partner.

To the extent the partnership agreement does not provide for a matter described in subsection (a), this chapter governs the matter.

A partnership agreement may not:

Vary the law applicable under Section 79-14-104;

Vary a limited partnership’s capacity under Section 79-14-111 to sue and be sued in its own name;

Vary any requirement, procedure, or other provision of this chapter pertaining to:

Registered agents; or

The Secretary of State, including provisions pertaining to records authorized or required to be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing under this chapter;

Subject to subsection (c)(8), without limiting other terms that may be included in a partnership agreement, the following rules apply:

The partnership agreement may:

Specify the method by which a specific act or transaction that would otherwise violate the duty of loyalty may be authorized or ratified by one or more disinterested and independent persons after full disclosure of all material facts; and

Alter the prohibition in Section 79-14-504(a)(2) so that the prohibition requires only that the partnership’s total assets not be less than the sum of its total liabilities.

If not manifestly unreasonable, the partnership agreement may:

Alter or eliminate the aspects of the duty of loyalty stated in Section 79-14-409(b);

Identify specific types or categories of activities that do not violate the duty of loyalty;

Alter the duty of care, but may not authorize conduct involving bad faith, willful or intentional misconduct, or knowing violation of law; and

Alter or eliminate any other fiduciary duty.

The court shall decide as a matter of law whether a term of a partnership agreement is manifestly unreasonable under subsection (c)(7) or (d)(2). The court:

Shall make its determination as of the time the challenged term became part of the partnership agreement and by considering only circumstances existing at that time; and

May invalidate the term only if, in light of the purposes, activities, and affairs of the limited partnership, it is readily apparent that:

The objective of the term is unreasonable; or

The term is an unreasonable means to achieve its objective.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-105 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 105;
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 42, effective from and after January 1, 2015; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the records a limited partnership was required to keep at its office. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-108.

Liability for false statement in certificate, see § 79-14-207.

Limited partner’s right to inspect and copy the partnership records required under this section, see § 79-14-305.

Obligation of partner to contribute cash equal to that portion of value, as stated in records kept under this section, of stated contribution of property or services not made, see § 79-14-502.

Allocation of profits and losses on basis of value, as stated in records kept under this section, of contributions made by each partner, see § 79-14-503.

Distribution of cash or other assets on basis of value, as stated in records kept under this section, of contributions made by each partner, see § 79-14-504.

Extent to which partner receives return of his contribution, as determined by reference to records kept under this section, see § 79-14-608.

Mississippi Entity Conversion and Domestication Act, see § 79-37-101 et seq.

Deceased general partner did not validly assign a general partnership interest to a conservator because a schedule listing the conservator as a general partner was not filed with the Secretary of State, as the limited partnership agreement, Miss. Code Ann. § 79-14-105(c)(3)(B), and former Miss. Code Ann. § 79-14-202(c)(1) [now § 79-14-202(d)(1)] required. Smith v. Maggie Mae, L.P., 225 So.3d 1243, 2016 Miss. App. LEXIS 267 (Miss. Ct. App. 2016), cert. denied, 216 So.3d 1149, 2017 Miss. LEXIS 213 (Miss. 2017).

§79-14-106.
Partnership agreement; effect on limited partnership and person becoming partner; preformation agreement.

A limited partnership is bound by and may enforce the partnership agreement, whether or not the partnership has itself manifested assent to the agreement.

A person that becomes a partner is deemed to assent to the partnership agreement.

Two (2) or more persons intending to become the initial partners of a limited partnership may make an agreement providing that upon the formation of the partnership the agreement will become the partnership agreement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-106 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 106, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] provided that a limited partnership could carry on any business that a partnership without limited partners could carry on.

State policy regarding issuance of governing licenses to limited partnerships, see § 75-76-219.

Eligibility requirements for limited partnerships to receive state gaming license, see § 75-76-221.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership §§ 774, 781.

68 C.J.S., Partnership § 576.

§79-14-107.
Partnership agreement; effect on third parties and relationship to records effective on behalf of limited partnership.

A partnership agreement may specify that its amendment requires the approval of a person that is not a party to the agreement or the satisfaction of a condition. An amendment is ineffective if its adoption does not include the required approval or satisfy the specified condition.

The obligations of a limited partnership and its partners to a person in the person’s capacity as a transferee or person dissociated as a partner are governed by the partnership agreement. Subject only to a court order issued under Section 79-14-703(b)(2) to effectuate a charging order, an amendment to the partnership agreement made after a person becomes a transferee or is dissociated as a partner:

Is effective with regard to any debt, obligation, or other liability of the partnership or its partners to the person in the person’s capacity as a transferee or person dissociated as a partner; and

Is not effective to the extent the amendment imposes a new debt, obligation, or other liability on the transferee or person dissociated as a partner.

If a record delivered by a limited partnership to the Secretary of State for filing becomes effective and contains a provision that would be ineffective under Section 79-14-105(c) or (d)(2) if contained in the partnership agreement, the provision is ineffective in the record.

Subject to subsection (c), if a record delivered by a limited partnership to the Secretary of State for filing becomes effective and conflicts with a provision of the partnership agreement:

The agreement prevails as to partners, persons dissociated as partners, and transferees; and

The record prevails as to other persons to the extent they reasonably rely on the record.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-107 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 107, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to business transactions of a partner with the partnership.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership § 228.

§79-14-108.
Required information.

A limited partnership shall maintain at its principal office the following information:

A current list showing the full name and last-known street and mailing addresses of each partner, separately identifying the general partners, in alphabetical order, and the limited partners, in alphabetical order;

A copy of the initial certificate of limited partnership and all amendments to and restatements of the certificate, together with signed copies of any powers of attorney under which any certificate, amendment, or restatement has been signed;

A copy of any filed articles of merger, conversion, or domestication;

A copy of the partnership’s federal, state, and local income tax returns and reports, if any, for the three (3) most recent years;

A copy of any partnership agreement made in a record and any amendment made in a record to any partnership agreement;

A copy of any financial statement of the partnership for the three (3) most recent years;

Reserved;

A copy of any record made by the partnership during the past three (3) years of any consent given by or vote taken of any partner pursuant to this chapter or the partnership agreement;

A copy of any statement of conversion or domestication filed under the Mississippi Entity Conversion and Domestication Act; and

Unless contained in a partnership agreement made in a record, a record stating:

A description and statement of the agreed value of contributions other than money made and agreed to be made by each partner;

The times at which, or events on the happening of which, any additional contributions agreed to be made by each partner are to be made;

For any person that is both a general partner and a limited partner, a specification of what transferable interest the person owns in each capacity; and

Any events upon the happening of which the partnership is to be dissolved and its activities and affairs wound up.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-108 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 108, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to indemnification. For present similar provisions relating to indemnification, see
§ 79-14-408.

§79-14-109.
Dual capacity.

A person may be both a general partner and a limited partner. A person that is both a general and limited partner has the rights, powers, duties, and obligations provided by this chapter and the partnership agreement in each of those capacities. When the person acts as a general partner, the person is subject to the obligations, duties, and restrictions under this chapter and the partnership agreement for general partners. When the person acts as a limited partner, the person is subject to the obligations, duties, and restrictions under this chapter and the partnership agreement for limited partners.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-110.
Nature, purpose, and duration of limited partnership.

A limited partnership is an entity distinct from its partners. A limited partnership is the same entity regardless of whether its certificate states that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership.

A limited partnership may have any lawful purpose, regardless of whether for profit.

A limited partnership has perpetual duration, unless otherwise specified in the partnership agreement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-111.
Powers.

A limited partnership has the capacity to sue and be sued in its own name and the power to do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities and affairs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-112.
Application to existing relationships.

Before January 1, 2017, this chapter governs only:

A limited partnership formed on or after July 1, 2015; and

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d), a limited partnership formed before July 1, 2015, which elects, in the manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement, to be subject to this chapter.

Sections 79-14-601 and 79-14-602 do not apply and a limited partner has the same right and power to dissociate from the limited partnership, with the same consequences, as existed immediately before July 1, 2015.

Section 79-14-603(4) does not apply.

Section 79-14-603(5) does not apply and a court has the same power to expel a general partner as the court had immediately before July 1, 2015.

Section 79-14-801(a)(3) does not apply and the connection between a person’s dissociation as a general partner and the dissolution of the limited partnership is the same as existed immediately before July 1, 2015.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d), on and after January 1, 2017, this chapter governs all limited partnerships.

With respect to a limited partnership formed before July 1, 2015, the following rules apply except as the partners otherwise elect in the manner provided in the partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement:

Section 79-14-110(c) does not apply and the limited partnership has whatever duration it had under the law applicable immediately before July 1, 2015.

The limited partnership is not required to amend its certificate of limited partnership to comply with Section 79-14-201(b)(5).

With respect to a limited partnership that elects pursuant to subsection (a)(2) to be subject to this chapter, after the election takes effect the provisions of this chapter relating to the liability of the limited partnership’s general partners to third parties apply:

Before January 1, 2017, to:

A third party that had not done business with the limited partnership in the year before the election took effect; and

A third party that had done business with the limited partnership in the year before the election took effect only if the third party knows or has been notified of the election; and

On and after January 1, 2017, to all third parties, but those provisions remain inapplicable to any obligation incurred while those provisions were inapplicable under paragraph (1)(B).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-113.
Supplemental principles of law.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-114.
Permittee names.

The name of a limited partnership may contain the name of any partner.

The name of a limited partnership that is not a limited liability limited partnership must contain the words “limited partnership” or the abbreviation “LP” or “L.P.” and may not contain the phrase “limited liability limited partnership” or the abbreviation “LLLP” or “L.L.L.P.”.

The name of a limited liability limited partnership must contain the phrase “limited liability limited partnership” or the abbreviation “LLLP” or “L.L.L.P.” and must not contain the abbreviation “LP” or “L.P.”.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g), the name of a limited partnership, and the name under which a foreign limited partnership may register to do business in this state, must be distinguishable on the records of the Secretary of State from any:

Name of an existing person whose formation required the filing of a record by the Secretary of State and which is not at the time administratively dissolved;

Name of a limited liability partnership whose statement of qualification is in effect;

Name under which a person is registered to do business in this state by the filing of a record by the Secretary of State;

Name reserved under Section 79-14-115 or other law of this state providing for the reservation of a name by the filing of a record by the Secretary of State; and

Name registered under the Fictitious Business Name Registration Act.

If a person consents in a record to the use of its name and submits an undertaking in a form satisfactory to the Secretary of State to change its name to a name that is distinguishable on the records of the Secretary of State from any name in any category of names in subsection (d), the name of the consenting person may be used by the person to which the consent was given.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g), in determining whether a name is the same as or not distinguishable on the records of the Secretary of State from the name of another person, words, phrases, or abbreviations indicating the type of person, such as “corporation,” “corp.,” “incorporated,” “Inc.,” “professional corporation,” “PC,” “P.C.,” “professional association,” “PA,” “P.A.,” “Limited,” “Ltd.,” “limited partnership,” “LP,” “L.P.,” “limited liability partnership,” “LLP” “L.L.P.,” “registered limited liability partnership,” “RLLP,” “R.L.L.P.,” “limited liability limited partnership,” “LLLP,” “L.L.L.P.,” “registered limited liability limited partnership,” “RLLLP,” “R.L.L.L.P.,” “limited liability company,” “LLC,” “L.L.C.,” “limited cooperative association,” “limited cooperative,” “LCA,” or “L.C.A.” may not be taken into account.

A person may consent in a record to the use of a name that is not distinguishable on the records of the Secretary of State from its name except for the addition of a word, phrase, or abbreviation indicating the type of person as provided in subsection (f). In such a case, the person need not change its name pursuant to subsection (e).

The name of a limited partnership may not contain the words “bank,” “banker,” “bankers,” “banking,” “trust company,” “insurance,” “trust,” “corporation,” “incorporated,” or any combination thereof, or any words of similar import.

A limited partnership or foreign limited partnership may use a name that is not distinguishable from a name described in subsection (d)(1) through (5) if:

The partnership delivers to the Secretary of State a certified copy of a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the right of the partnership to use the name in this state; or

The other limited partnership or person consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking in a form satisfactory to the Secretary of State to change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from the name of the applying limited partnership.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-115.
Reservation of name.

A person may reserve the exclusive use of a legal name that complies with Section 79-14-114 by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. The application must state the name and addresses of the applicant and the name to be reserved. If the Secretary of State finds that the name is available, the Secretary of State shall reserve the name for the applicant’s exclusive use for one hundred eighty (180) days. The one-hundred-eighty-day period may be renewed once by the applicant by filing a renewal application within thirty (30) days before the expiration of the initial one-hundred-eighty-day period.

The owner of a reserved name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the Secretary of State a signed notice in a record of the transfer which states the name and address of the person to which the reservation is being transferred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-116.
[Reserved].

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-117.
[Reserved].

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-118.
[Reserved].

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-119.
[Reserved].

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-120.
[Reserved].

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-121.
Service of process, notice, or demand.

Notice or demand required or permitted by law on a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this state is governed by Section 79-35-13. Service of process is governed by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-122.
Delivery of record.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, permissible means of delivery of a record include delivery by hand, mail, conventional commercial practice, and electronic transmission.

Delivery to the Secretary of State is effective only when a record is received by the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.